hunspell/kpv/komi.aff
FLAG long
SFX O5 Y 1050 # десубстантивы -а, -тӧм + частица + джык
SFX O5 0 а/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧсь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 ь я/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧсь/G2 ь
SFX O5 й я/G2 й
SFX O5 й яӧсь/G2 й
SFX O5 0 тӧм/G2 .
SFX O5 0 тӧма/G2 .
SFX O5 0 тӧмӧсь/G2 .
SFX O5 0 аад/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аам/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аанӧй/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 ааныд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 ааным/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 ааныс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аас/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аадӧсь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аамӧсь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 ааныдӧсь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аанымӧсь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аанысӧсь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аасӧсь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 акӧд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 ала/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 алань/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьӧ/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьын/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьысь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьсянь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьӧд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьӧдз/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьным/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьныс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьӧдзныд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьӧдзным/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьӧдзныс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьӧдзыд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьӧдзым/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьӧдзыс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьӧдныд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьӧдным/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьӧдныс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьӧдыд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьӧдым/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьӧдыс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьсьыд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьсьым/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьсьыныд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьсьыным/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьсьыныс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьсьыс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьсяньныд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьсяньным/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьсяньныс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьсяньыд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьсяньыс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьтіныд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьтіным/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьтіныс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьтіыд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьтіым/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьтіыс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьыд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьым/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланьыс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланяд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланям/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланяныд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланяным/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланяныс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аланяс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 алӧн/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 алӧнӧсь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 алы/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 алысь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 анад/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 анам/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 ананыд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 ананым/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 ананыс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 анас/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аныд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аныдкӧд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аныдла/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аныдлань/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аныдлӧн/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аныдлы/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аныдлысь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аным/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 анымкӧд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 анымла/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 анымлань/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 анымлӧн/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 анымлы/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 анымлысь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 анымӧс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аныс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аныскӧд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 анысла/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аныслань/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аныслӧн/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аныслы/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аныслысь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 анысӧ/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 анытӧ/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧ/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧдз/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧдзныд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧдзным/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧдзныс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧдзыд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧдзым/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧдзыс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧдныд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧдным/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧдныс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧдыд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧдым/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧдыс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧй/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧйкӧд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧйла/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧйлань/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧйланьсянь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧйлӧн/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧйлы/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧйлысь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧйся/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧйсянь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧйтӧг/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧн/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аӧс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 асӧ/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 асьыд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 асьым/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 асьыныд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 асьыным/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 асьыныс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 асьыс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 ася/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 асяныд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 асяным/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 асяныс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 асянь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 асяньныд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 асяньным/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 асяньныс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 асяньыд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 асяньым/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 асяньыс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 асяыд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 асяыс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аті/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 атіныд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 атіным/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 атіныс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 атіыд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 атіым/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 атіыс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 атӧ/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 атӧг/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 атӧгныд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 атӧгным/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 атӧгныс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 атӧгыд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 атӧгыс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аыд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аыдкӧд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аыдла/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аыдлань/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аыдлӧн/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аыдлы/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аыдлысь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аын/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аынӧсь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аыс/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аыскӧд/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аысла/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аыслань/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аыслӧн/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аыслы/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аыслысь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аысь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 0 аысьӧсь/G2 [^ьй]
SFX O5 ь яад/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яам/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яанӧй/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яаныд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яаным/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яаныс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яас/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яадӧсь/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яамӧсь/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яаныдӧсь/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яанымӧсь/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яанысӧсь/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яасӧсь/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь якӧд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яла/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ялань/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьӧ/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьын/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьысь/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьсянь/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьӧд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьӧдз/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьным/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьныс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьӧдзныд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьӧдзным/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьӧдзныс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьӧдзыд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьӧдзым/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьӧдзыс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьӧдныд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьӧдным/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьӧдныс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьӧдыд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьӧдым/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьӧдыс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьсьыд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьсьым/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьсьыныд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьсьыным/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьсьыныс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьсьыс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьсяньныд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьсяньным/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьсяньныс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьсяньыд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьсяньыс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьтіныд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьтіным/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьтіныс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьтіыд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьтіым/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьтіыс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьыд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьым/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланьыс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланяд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланям/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланяныд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланяным/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланяныс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яланяс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ялӧн/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ялӧнӧсь/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ялы/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ялысь/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь янад/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь янам/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь янаныд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь янаным/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь янаныс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь янас/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яныд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яныдкӧд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яныдла/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яныдлань/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яныдлӧн/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яныдлы/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яныдлысь/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яным/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь янымкӧд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь янымла/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь янымлань/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь янымлӧн/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь янымлы/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь янымлысь/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь янымӧс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яныс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яныскӧд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь янысла/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яныслань/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яныслӧн/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яныслы/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яныслысь/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь янысӧ/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь янытӧ/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧ/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧдз/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧдзныд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧдзным/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧдзныс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧдзыд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧдзым/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧдзыс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧдныд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧдным/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧдныс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧдыд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧдым/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧдыс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧй/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧйкӧд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧйла/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧйлань/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧйланьсянь/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧйлӧн/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧйлы/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧйлысь/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧйся/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧйсянь/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧйтӧг/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧн/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яӧс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ясӧ/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ясьыд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ясьым/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ясьыныд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ясьыным/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ясьыныс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ясьыс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яся/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ясяныд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ясяным/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ясяныс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ясянь/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ясяньныд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ясяньным/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ясяньныс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ясяньыд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ясяньым/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ясяньыс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ясяыд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ясяыс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь яті/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ятіныд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ятіным/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ятіныс/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ятіыд/G2 ь
SFX O5 ь ятіым/G2 ь
