hunspell/kpv/komi.dic
Бердемлек/J1O7O8O9O5O6
Глонасс/J1O7O8O5O6
ИзьваСтрой/J1O7O8O9O5O6
Комиферма/J1O7O8O5O6
Могилевводстрой/J1O7O8O9O5O6
Продторгком/J1O7O8O5O6
Севертрансстрой/J1O7O8O5O6
Теплицмонтаж/J1O7O8O5O6
Човскӧй/J1O7O8O5O6
гослесконтроль/J2O7O8O9O5O6
обсуд/J2O7O8O9O5O6
Аккатуй/J3O7O8O9O5O6
фокке-вульф/J3O7O8O9O5O6#  plane
Лада/J3O7O8O9O5O6
ясанг/J4O7O8O5O6# Ханты  ~
лудъяин/N0O1O2O3O5O6
вердчанін/N0O1O2O3O5O6
дзугсьӧмин/N0O1O2O3O5O6
кульманін/N0O1O2O3O5O6
небыдін/N0O1O2O3O5O6
пывсянін/N0O1O2O3O5O6
урчитӧмин/N0O1O2O3O5O6
пазӧдӧмин/N0O1O2O3O5O6
кӧрчага/N1O1O2O3O5O6
тупка/N1O1O2O3O5O6
пыдна/N1O1O2O3O5O6
варнича/N1O1O2O3O5O6
зыв/N1O1O2O3O5O6
яг/N1O1O2O3O5O6
донӧд/N1O1O2O3O5O6
вож/N1O1O2O3O5O6
гури-гари/N1O1O2O3O5O6
ваташой/N1O1O2O3O5O6
ӧтлек/N1O1O2O3O5O6
жӧм/N1O1O2O3O5O6
зыран/N1O1O2O3O5O6
камӧ/N1O1O2O3O5O6
важдыр/N1O1O2O3O5O6
эбӧс/N1O1O2O3O5O6
кыкачут/N1O1O2O3O5O6
пелядь/N1O1O2O3O5O6
корӧсь/N1O1O2O3O5O6
няйт/N1A1O1O2O3O5O6
чирпыриг/N2O1O2O3O5O6
скӧрпоз/N2O1O2O3O5O6
вирсер/N2O1O2O3O5O6
синакань/N2O1O2O3O5O6
векнилун/N7O1O2O3O5
норлун/N7O1O2O3O5
куттӧмлун/N7O1O2O3O5
ентас/N8O1O2O3O5O6
пӧсьпетӧм/N8O1O2O3O5O6
видеокыйӧдчысь/N8O1O2O3O5O6
кысӧ/N9O1O2O3O5O6
жывӧтина/N9O1O2O3O5O6
шатия-братия/N9O1O2O3O5O6
декадник/R1O1O2O3O5O6
киоскёр/R1O1O2O3O5O6
идиотка/R1O1O2O3O5O6
особа/R1O1O2O3O5O6
байда/R1O1O2O3O5O6
рабфаковка/R1O1O2O3O5O6
сходка/R1O1O2O3O5O6
соцполитика/R1O1O2O3O5O6
карболка/R1O1O2O3O5O6
пятитонка/R1O1O2O3O5O6
фреска/R1O1O2O3O5O6
лейбористка/R1O1O2O3O5O6
живучка/R1O1O2O3O5O6
внученька/R1O1O2O3O5O6
новизна/R1O1O2O3O5O6
сельхозкоммуна/R1O1O2O3O5O6
кинопресса/R1O1O2O3O5O6
греча/R1O1O2O3O5O6
птичнича/R1O1O2O3O5O6
столб/R1O1O2O3O5O6
антирейтинг/R1O1O2O3O5O6
людоед/R1O1O2O3O5O6
сосуд/R1O1O2O3O5O6
сюрприз/R1O1O2O3O5O6
ведомости/R1O1O2O3O5O6
посланнӧй/R1O1O2O3O5O6
бортпаёк/R1O1O2O3O5O6
страдник/R1O1O2O3O5O6
подлинник/R1O1O2O3O5O6
кишечник/R1O1O2O3O5O6
эстетик/R1O1O2O3O5O6
жалӧбщик/R1O1O2O3O5O6
стройбанк/R1O1O2O3O5O6
электроток/R1O1O2O3O5O6
хомяк/R1O1O2O3O5O6
мини-футбол/R1O1O2O3O5O6
роддом/R1O1O2O3O5O6
видеоэкран/R1O1O2O3O5O6
одеколон/R1O1O2O3O5O6
ремесленничество/R1O1O2O3O5O6
спецстроительство/R1O1O2O3O5O6
подмастерйӧ/R1O1O2O3O5O6
вычисленньӧ/R1O1O2O3O5O6
обаянньӧ/R1O1O2O3O5O6
примыканньӧ/R1O1O2O3O5O6
угро-финноведенньӧ/R1O1O2O3O5O6
стопар/R1O1O2O3O5O6
кӧстер/R1O1O2O3O5O6
политинформатор/R1O1O2O3O5O6
соляр/R1O1O2O3O5O6
урус/R1O1O2O3O5O6
паркет/R1O1O2O3O5O6
медпункт/R1O1O2O3O5O6
мотоспорт/R1O1O2O3O5O6
классицист/R1O1O2O3O5O6
ток-шоу/R1O1O2O3O5O6
кузнеч/R1O1O2O3O5O6
выкидыш/R1O1O2O3O5O6
знаменатель/R1O1O2O3O5O6
редикуль/R1O1O2O3O5O6
гидрогеология/R1O1O2O3O5O6
медкомиссия/R1O1O2O3O5O6
квитанция/R1O1O2O3O5O6
хохотунья/R1O1O2O3O5O6
филомат/R2O1O2O3O5O6
щипчик/R2O1O2O3O5O6
масрестлинг/R2O1O2O3O5O6
нефролог/R2O1O2O3O5O6
амарант/R2O1O2O3O5O6
аэронавтика/R2O1O2O3O5O6
брош/R2O1O2O3O5O6
гарнитура/R2O1O2O3O5O6
дан/R2O1O2O3O5O6
дуплет/R2O1O2O3O5O6
казан/R2O1O2O3O5O6
клаузула/R2O1O2O3O5O6
кратер/R2O1O2O3O5O6
лотос/R2O1O2O3O5O6
миньон/R2O1O2O3O5O6
обшлаг/R2O1O2O3O5O6
пентагон/R2O1O2O3O5O6
прима/R2O1O2O3O5O6
ресивер/R2O1O2O3O5O6
сибарит/R2O1O2O3O5O6
суффолк/R2O1O2O3O5O6
трон/R2O1O2O3O5O6
фокстрот/R2O1O2O3O5O6
чадра/R2O1O2O3O5O6
эль/R2O1O2O3O5O6
психотип/R2O1O2O3O5O6
германка/R3O1O2O3O5
митишукчи/R3O1O2O3O5
торпедовеч/R3O1O2O3O5
кырнышпи/S0O1O2O5
Иволгинск/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Англия/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Богородскӧй/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Вьетнам/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Добруджа/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Кале/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Копенгаген/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Луанда/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Мурманск/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Отраднӧй/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Рат/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Слобода/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Торжок/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Рица/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Эритрея/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Борщи/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Калемегдан/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Мозыр/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Седловина/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Черкессия/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Венето/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Ай-Петри/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Клэпхем/T1O1O2O3O5O6
Омлада/T2O1O2O3O5O6
Веждін/T2O1O2O3O5O6
Палькъям/T2O1O2O3O5O6
Емваль/T2O1O2O3O5O6
Почток/T2O1O2O3O5O6
Васильевка/T2O1O2O3O5O6# (Izva) q eq Едэма
Берёзовка/T2O1O2O3O5O6# (Luzdor; Pecora)
Ёдва/T2O1O2O3O5O6# (Udora)
Ву/T2O1O2O3O5O6# ju (Udora)
Гремячӧй/T3O1O2O3O5O6
